src/morphology/chr.all.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for UNDEFINED language
! Copyright © 2012 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                Cherokee morphological analyser                      
! ========================================================================== !

!! This file shows the Cherokee multichar symbols and initial lexica.

Multichar_Symbols  !!≈ !!!@CODE@ definitions

!! !!Analysis symbols
!! ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms of Cherokee are presented
!! in this system in terms of following symbols.

!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

!! The parts-of-speech could perhaps also be (remove irrelevant):

+N	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+V	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+A	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Adv    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pron   !!= * @CODE@ =
+CS	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+CC	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Adp    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Po	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pr	    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Interj !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pcle   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Num    !!= * @CODE@ =

+Def  !!= * @CODE@ =
+Indef !!= * @CODE@ =

!! The parts of speech are further split up into:

+Prop   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pers   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Dem    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Interr !!= * @CODE@ =
+Refl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Recipr !!= * @CODE@ =
+Rel    !!= * @CODE@ =
+Indef  !!= * @CODE@ =

!! The Usage extents are marked using the following tags:
 +Err/Sub     !!= * @CODE@ = Substandard forms
 +Use/-Spell  !!= * @CODE@ = Not included in speller

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Number

+Sg   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pl   !!= * @CODE@ =

!! The verbs can have the following morphological features:

+1sg   !!= * @CODE@ =
+2dl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+2pl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+2sg   !!= * @CODE@ =
+3pl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+3sg   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Edl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Epl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Fut   !!= * @CODE@ =
+FutImp   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Hab   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Idl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+ImmPast   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Inf   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Ipl   !!= * @CODE@ =
+Pres   !!= * @CODE@ =
+PresImp   !!= * @CODE@ =
+RemPast   !!= * @CODE@ =
+RepPast   !!= * @CODE@ =

!! Verb prefixes

@U.prefix.1sg@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.2dl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.2pl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.2sg@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.3pl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.3sg@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.Edl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.Epl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.Idl@   !!= * @CODE@ =
@U.prefix.Ipl@   !!= * @CODE@ =

%^WS	!!=* @CODE@ = whitespace dummy, for twolc

! Abbreviated words are classified with:

+ABBR !!= * @CODE@ = Abbreviations
+ACR  !!= * @CODE@ = Acronyms

 
!! Special symbols are classified with:
+CLB   !!= * @CODE@ = Clause boundary symbols
+PUNCT !!= * @CODE@ = Other punctuation marks
+LEFT  !!= * @CODE@ = Left part of paired symbols
+RIGHT !!= * @CODE@ = Right part of paired symbols

!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
+TV !!= * @CODE@ 
+IV !!= * @CODE@ 

!! Special multiword units are analysed with:
 +Multi !!= * @CODE@ 

!! Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
 +Guess !!= * @CODE@ 

%>


LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in Cherokee start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
!   Nouns   ;
  VerbPrefixes   ;    !!= * @CODE@ 
!   Adjectives  ;
!   Pronouns    ;
!   Numerals    ;
!   Postpositions ;
!   Particles ;
!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+N+sg+nom:0     #   ;
+N+pl+nom:i     #   ;
+N+sg+loc:as    #   ;
+N+pl+loc:ias   #   ;
+N+sg+acc:at    #   ;
+N+pl+acc:iat   #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON VerbPrefixes
Verb_Prefixes_Int1 ;
Verb_Prefixes_Int2 ;

LEXICON Verb_Prefixes_Int1
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮨ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮻ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Present_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮫ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Future_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꮹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int1 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int1 ;
